District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.19i

Nondiscrimination against TANF and POWER applicants and recipients.

A person’s application for, or receipt of, TANF or POWER benefits shall not affect the applicability to that person of District and federal laws prohibiting discrimination.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 519i
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(w), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.19i.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(w) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary addition of section, see note to § 4-205.19a.